Tennessee, session 114, HB1830.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, Chapter 11, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "railroad crossing" means any location where a public
street or highway is crossed by, or intersects with, a railroad track or line.
(b) A railroad company controlling the movement of a railroad train, car, engine,
or other equipment shall not permit the train, car, engine, or other equipment to obstruct
or cause the obstruction of a railroad crossing for a period in excess of thirty (30)
consecutive minutes if the railroad crossing provides the primary ingress and egress to
and from a hospital, residential neighborhood, or occupied residence based on vehicle
traffic counts.
(c)
(1) The commissioner of transportation may, after providing notice and
opportunity for a hearing under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act,
compiled in title 4, chapter 5, impose a civil penalty of one thousand dollars
($1,000) per violation against the railroad company.
(2) If a second or subsequent violation of subsection (b) occurs at the
same railroad crossing a second or subsequent time within eighteen (18) months
from the date of the first occurrence, the commissioner may impose, after
providing notice and opportunity for a hearing under the Uniform Administrative
HB1830
011148
- 1 -

Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, a civil penalty up to three thousand
dollars ($3,000) upon the railroad company.
(d) All civil penalties collected by the commissioner pursuant to this section must
be allocated as follows:
(1) Fifteen percent (15%) must be retained by the department of
transportation for costs of administration of this section; and
(2) Eighty-five percent (85%) must be distributed to the county or
municipality in which the violation of subsection (b) occurred and used solely for
railroad crossing projects on county roads or municipal streets within the county
or municipality, as applicable.
(e) A railroad company is not immune from any civil liability that may be imposed
or incurred for bodily injury to, or the death of, a person as a result of the person being
transported in an ambulance or other emergency services vehicle that is blocked or
obstructed at a railroad crossing in violation of subsection (b).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to violations occurring on or after that date.
- 2 - 011148